District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Empower the D.C. State Board of Education Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 403 of the Public Education Reform Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law
17-9, D.C. Official Code § 38–2652) is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (c)(1) is amended by inserting the phrase “or amendment” after the word
“approval”;
(b) A new subsection (c-1) is inserted to read as follows:
“(c-1) (1) Within 90 days of the Board adopting a resolution initiating the submission of a
request for policy action concerning a matter, policy, plan, rule, regulation, or standard
enumerated in subsection (a) of this section, the State Superintendent of Education shall transmit
to the Board and the Chair of the Council committee with jurisdiction over the Board:
“(A) A written work plan detailing how the State Superintendent of
Education will submit a request for policy action within 6 months of the Board’s resolution; or

“(B) A written statement explaining why the State Superintendent of
Education opposes submitting a request for policy action and a draft Council resolution
disapproving the Board resolution.
“(2) If the Council fails to adopt a resolution affirming the State Superintendent of
Education’s opposition to submitting a request for policy action within 120 days of the Board
resolution, the Superintendent of Education shall transmit to the Board and the Chair of the
Council committee with jurisdiction over the Board a work plan detailing how the State
Superintendent of Education will submit a request for policy action within 9 months of the
Board’s resolution.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.